Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202044-6839
Health benefits plan, defined.

(1) Health benefits plan means a benefits plan which pays or provides hospital and medical expense benefits for covered services and is delivered or issued for delivery in this state by or through an insurer.

(2) Health benefits plan does not include the medical assistance program, medicare, medicare advantage, accident-only, credit, disability, or long-term care coverage, TRICARE supplement coverage, coverage arising out of a workers' compensation or similar law, automobile medical payment insurance, personal injury protection insurance, and hospital confinement indemnity coverage.

Laws 2020, LB997, § 6.
January 1, 2021